Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.010

Civil practice to govern—Designation of proceedings—Decrees.

(1) Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, the practice in civil action shall govern all proceedings under this chapter, except that trial by jury is dispensed with.

(2) A proceeding for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal separation or a declaration concerning the validity of a marriage or domestic partnership shall be entitled "In re the marriage of . . . . . . and . . . . . ." or "In re the domestic partnership of . . . . . . and . . . . . ." Such proceedings may be filed in the superior court of the county where the petitioner resides.

(3) In cases where there has been no prior proceeding in this state involving the marital or domestic partnership status of the parties or support obligations for a minor child, a separate parenting and support proceeding between the parents shall be entitled "In re the parenting and support of . . . . . ."

(4) The initial pleading in all proceedings under this chapter shall be denominated a petition. A responsive pleading shall be denominated a response. Other pleadings, and all pleadings in other matters under this chapter shall be denominated as provided in the civil rules for superior court.

(5) In this chapter, "decree" includes "judgment".

(6) A decree of dissolution, of legal separation, or a declaration concerning the validity of a marriage or domestic partnership shall not be awarded to one of the parties, but shall provide that it affects the status previously existing between the parties in the manner decreed.

(7) In order to provide a means by which to facilitate a fair, efficient, and swift process to resolve matters regarding custody and visitation when a parent serving in the armed forces receives temporary duty, deployment, activation, or mobilization orders from the military, the court shall, upon motion of such a parent:

(a) For good cause shown, hold an expedited hearing in custody and visitation matters instituted under this chapter when the military duties of the parent have a material effect on the parent's ability, or anticipated ability, to appear in person at a regularly scheduled hearing; and

(b) Upon reasonable advance notice to the affected parties and for good cause shown, allow the parent to present testimony and evidence by electronic means in custody and visitation matters instituted under this chapter when the military duties of the parent have a material effect on the parent's ability to appear in person at a regularly scheduled hearing. The phrase "electronic means" includes communication by telephone, video teleconference, or the internet.

[ 2009 c 502 s 2; 2008 c 6 s 1004; 1989 c 375 s 1; 1987 c 460 s 1; 1975 c 32 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.